Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.530

Condemnation.

Consistent with constitutional requirements, the department may take condemnation action against food, which may include ordering destruction of the food, if the department has probable cause to believe that immediate containment or destruction of the food is necessary to protect public health. A court shall not allow recovery of damages in a condemnation action if the court finds that there was probable cause for such action.

[ 2018 c 236 s 504.]